Alaska, session 34, SB260.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 23.30 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Sec. 23.30.033. Workers' compensation insurance certificates. (a) An 05 insurer that has issued a policy of insurance to an employer under this chapter shall 06 issue the employer a written certificate of insurance that certifies that the employer has 07 secured the payment of compensation under this chapter. The certificate must display 08 the following information: 09 (1) the name of the employer certified as insured; 10 (2) the name of the insurer; 11 (3) the number of employees employed by the employer certified as 12 insured; 13 (4) the estimated payroll for each employee classification; 14 (5) the expiration date of the insurance policy; and 15 (6) a QR code that directs a user to the online verification tool required 01 under (b) of this section; in this paragraph, "QR code" means a quick-response, 02 machine-readable code consisting of an array of black and white squares, used to 03 provide access to online information through the camera on a digital device such as a 04 cellular telephone. 05 (b) The division shall provide on the division's Internet website an online 06 verification tool that allows a user to verify an employer's workers' compensation 07 insurance coverage. 08 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 09 read: 10 APPLICABILITY. AS 23.30.033, added by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to a workers' 11 compensation insurance certificate and a workers' compensation insurance policy issued, 12 delivered, or renewed on or after the effective date of sec. 1 of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.